Utah statutes.
4-10-4.   Manufacture, repair, or wholesale sale of bedding, upholstered furniture, quilted clothing, or filling material -- License required.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in the manufacture, repair, or wholesale sale of any bedding, upholstered furniture, quilted clothing, or filling material without a license issued by the department.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1979 General Session

